apertium-bhw.bhw.lexd
# Morphological Transducer for Biak

# Part of speech categories
# <n>      # Noun
# <v>      # Verb
# <adv>    # Adverb
# <prn>    # pronoun
# <det>    # determiner
# <cnjcoo> # coordinating conjunction
# <cnjsub> # subordinating conjunction
# <pr>     # preposition

# <sent>   # Sentence-ending punctuation
# <guio>   # Hyphen
# <cm>     # Comma
# <apos>   # Apostrophe
# <quot>   # Quotation mark
# <lquot>  # Left quotation mark
# <rquot>  # Right quotation mark
# <lpar>   # Left parenthesis
# <rpar>   # Right parenthesis

# Verbs
# <tv>     # transitive
# <iv>     # intransitive
# <p1>     # 1st person
# <p2>     # 2nd person
# <p3>     # 3rd person
# <sg>     # singular
# <du>     # dual
# <pc>     # paucal
# <pl>     # plural
# <plan>   # plural, animate
# <plinan> # plural, inanimate
# <inc>    # inclusive
# <ex>     # exclusive
# <an>     # animate
# <inan>   # inanimate

# Complex articles
# <pers> # personal
# <spc>  # specific
# <giv>  # givenness
# <dem>  # demonstrative

# Possessive

# <pos> # possessive 
# <px1sg> # possessor, 1st person
# <px2sg> # possessor, 2nd person
# <px3sg> # possessor, 3rd person
# <px1duinc> # possessor, 1st person dual, inclusive
# <px1duex> # possessor, 1st person dual, exclusive
# <pxinc> # possessor, inclusive -- removed
# <pxex> # possessor, exclusive -- removed
# <px2du> # possessor, 2nd person dual
# <px3du> # possessor, 3rd person dual
# <px1pc> # possessor, paucal
# <px1plinc> # possessor, 1st person plural, inclusive
# <px1plex> # possessor, 1st person plural, exclusive
# <px2plan> # possessor, 3rd person plural, animate
# <px2plinan> # possessor, 3rd person plural, animate





# Other symbols
# >      # Morpheme boundary

###############################################################################
###                       M O R P H O T A C T I C S                         ###
###############################################################################

PATTERNS
Punctuation
#VerbPat ([+:] Fill [<ij>:])? # this line causes memory overflow TODO
NounPat ([+:] Fill [<ij>:])?
ComplexArticle
Possessor Possessum [<spc>:]
Conjunction
Prepositions ([+:] Fill [<ij>:])?
:InalienableCircumfix(1)[-pair] InalienableRoot[-pair] [<n><pos>:] InalienableCircumfix(2)[-pair]
:InalienableCircumfix(1)[-nonpair] InalienableRoot[-nonpair] [<n><pos>:] InalienableCircumfix(2)[-nonpair]
Adverb
Aux
Pronoun
PostVerb
Interjection [<ij>:]

PATTERN VerbPat
:Verb-CC-Affix ( Verb-CC(1) [<v>:] Verb-CC(2): ) Verb-CC-Affix:
:Verb-V-Affix  ( Verb-V(1) [<v>:] Verb-V(2): ) Verb-V-Affix:
:Verb-CV-Affix ( Verb-CV(1) [<v>:] Verb-CV(2): ) Verb-CV-Affix:

PATTERN NounPat
Noun [<n>:] NounSpecificity?
Noun [<n>:] [+:>] Pronoun-Specifier

PATTERN ComplexArticle
Pronoun-Specifier DemonstrativeDeterminer? MotionPat?
:Givenness Pronoun-Specifier Givenness: DemonstrativeDeterminer? MotionPat?


PATTERN DemonstrativeDeterminer
[+:] Demonstrative [<det><dem>:]
[+:] :Directional Demonstrative [<det><dem>:] [+:] Directional: [<adv>:]

PATTERN MotionPat
[+:] Motion


###############################################################################
###                          L E X I C O N                                  ###
###############################################################################

LEXICON Directional
rum:>rum
ri:>ri
ra:>ra
re:>re
pon:>pon
pur:>pur
yas:>yas
vav:>vas
vun:>vun
var:>var

LEXICON Demonstrative
ne:>ne
ya:>ya
wa:>wa

LEXICON Motion
ma<adv>:>ma
fa<adv>:>fa
ra<adv>:>ra

LEXICON Givenness

<giv>:an>

LEXICON Pronoun-Specifier

aya<prn><pers><p1><sg><spc>:yai
aw<prn><pers><p2><sg><spc>:aw{Y}{a}
i<prn><pers><p3><sg><spc>:{Y}{a}
ku<prn><pers><p1><du><inc><spc>:ku{Y}{a}
nu<prn><pers><p1><du><ex><spc>:nu{Y}{a}
mu<prn><pers><p2><du><spc>:mu{Y}{a}
su<prn><pers><p3><du><spc>:su{Y}{a}
sko<prn><pers><p3><pc><spc>:sko{Y}{a}
ko<prn><pers><p1><pl><inc><spc>:ko{Y}{a}
inko<prn><pers><p1><pl><ex><spc>:inko{Y}{a}
mko<prn><pers><p2><pl><spc>:mko{Y}{a}
si<prn><pers><p3><pl><an><spc>:s{Y}{a}
na<prn><pers><p3><pl><inan><spc>:na

LEXICON Verb-CV-Affix

<p1><sg>:ya>
<p2><sg>:{2}
<p3><sg>:{3}
<p1><du><ex>:nu>
<p1><du><inc>:ku>
<p2><du>:mu>
<p3><du>:su>
<p3><pc>:sko>
<p1><pl><ex>:nko>
<p1><pl><ex>:nggo> # Dir/LR
<p1><pl><inc>:ko>
<p2><pl>:mko>
<p3><pl><an>:si>
<p3><pl><inan>:na>

LEXICON Verb-CV(2)

so:s{W}o     <tv>: # throw
ra:r{W}a     <iv>: # go
van:v{W}an   <tv>: # wash
nas:n{W}as   <tv>: # smell
kain:k{W}ain <iv>: # sit
vark:v{W}ark <iv>: # lie, live
pauk:p{W}auk <tv>: # peel
rok:r{W}ok   <iv>: # sound, heard
na:n{W}a     <tv>: # have
be:b{W}e     <tv>: # become
mam:m{W}am   <tv>: # see
rew:r{W}ew   <tv>: # lick
sun:s{W}un   <iv>: # enter
pan:p{W}an   <tv>: # touch
kar:k{W}ar   <iv>: # cut


LEXICON Verb-CC(2)

srow:srow         <tv>: # meet
ba:ba             <iv>: # big
mran:mran         <iv>: # walk
mar:mar           <iv>: # die
fan:fan           <tv>: # feed/take care of
snai:snai         <tv>: # light, enlightens
sam:sam           <iv>: # be hot
mbrow:mbrow       <iv>: # be thirsty
fafyar:fafyar     <tv>: # tell a story
fawar:fawar       <tv>: # tell a story
mnai:mnai         <iv>: # stop
fur:fur           <tv>: # build
bro:bro           <iv>: # empty
farkor:farkor     <iv>: # study
swarepen:swarepen <tv>: # remember
bur:bur           <iv>: # leave
fawi:fawi         <iv>: # know
skop:skop         <tv>: # kick
kfin:kfin         <tv>: # lead
dwark:dwark       <tv>: # block
vyar:vyar         <iv>: # swollen
ser:ser           <tv>: # fill
so:so             <tv>: # follow
kofen:kofen       <tv>: # say

LEXICON Verb-CC-Affix

<p1><sg>:ya>
<p2><sg>:wa>
<p3><sg>:i>
<p1><du><ex>:nu>
<p1><du><inc>:ku>
<p2><du>:mu>
<p3><du>:su>
<p3><pc>:sko>
<p1><pl><ex>:nko>
<p1><pl><ex>:nggo> # Dir/LR
<p1><pl><inc>:ko>
<p2><pl>:mko>
<p3><pl><an>:si>
<p3><pl><inan>:na>

LEXICON Verb-V(2)

arok:arok    <iv>:       # be straight
obe:obe      <tv>:       # say
obe:ove      <tv>:       # say
orn:orn      <tv>:       # swallow
inm:inm      <tv>:       # drink
ores:ores    <iv>:       # stand
an:an        <tv>:       # eat
fararwer     <iv>:       # keep changing in a circle
awos:awos    <iv>:       # speak

LEXICON Verb-V-Affix

<p1><sg>:y>
<p2><sg>:w>
<p3><sg>:d>
<p1><du><ex>:nuy>
<p1><du><inc>:kuy>
<p2><du>:muy>
<p3><du>:suy>
<p3><pc>:sk>
<p1><pl><ex>:nk>
<p1><pl><ex>:ngg> # Dir/LR
<p1><pl><inc>:k>
<p2><pl>:mk>
<p3><pl><an>:s>
<p3><pl><inan>:n>

LEXICON Noun

yuk:yuk # ukelele
Wardo:Wardo #Wardo (a place)
Sepse:Sepse #Sepse (a place)
Mananamakrdi:Mananamakrdi #Name of a legendary man
Kormsamba:Kormsamba #a name
snewar:snewar #belly
mnu:mnu #village
saroi:saroi #whale
vanda:vanda #seaside
snari:snari #mother
rofan:rofan #dog
ikak:ikak #snake
marandan:marandan #life/trip 
mnu:mnu #village
dares:dares #sun
ras:ras #day
mnggarm:mnggarm #voice
tahun:tahun #year
paik:paik #month
rusa:rusa #deer
rum:rum #house
romawa:romawa #boy
roma:roma # boy
snonsnon:snonsnon #name
srai:srai #coconut
mars:mars #mars (type of fruit)
bon:bon #fruit/mountain
ina:ina #girl
abris:abris #grass
abyab:abyab #cave
acara:acara #party
afyak:afyak #pillow
ba:ba #hill, top, part
ai:ai #wood
aibe:aibe #coffin
aiknam:aiknam #tree
aimun:aimun #firewood
ainkyon:ainkyon #stick
aiwan:aiwan #animal
alamat:alamat #address
allah:allah #God
amen:amen #bamboo
Amerika:Amerika #America
anak:anak #child
ananun:ananun #message
andoi:andoi #seaweed
angkanken:angkanken #moss
anum:anum #wood
apen:apen #roast
apus:apus #grandparent, grandchild
ari:ari #Sunday
sim:sim #bedroom
binsar:binsar # old woman
wemin:wemin # leg
korben:korben # dragon
insar:insar # old woman
kpu:kpu #grandchild
swan:swan #sea
fioro:fioro # long time
knafofr:knafofr # cheek
romamkun:romamkun # boy
mkamor:mkamor # eye
majelis:majelis # deacon
jemaat:jemaat # congregation
kero:kero #little place
gelas:gelas # glass
Vyak:Vyak # Biak
fawawi:fawawi # knowledge
sup:sup # land
kam:kam #all 
fararyor:fararyor #request
farbakbuk:farbakbuk #marriage
sampak:sampak #road
faru:faru # middle
saneraro:saneraro # heart
fawar:fawar #story
fafyar:fafyar #story
sapi:sapi #cow
festa:festa #party
saran:saran #suggestion
sararyur:sararyur #poison
fno:fno #nephew
foto:foto #photo
fuar:fuar #trunk
saranden:saranden #holy
fyor:fyor #time
saswar:saswar # love
gereja:gereja #church
snon:snon #man
mob:mob #place
wos:wos #word
bar:bar #part
kawasa:kawasa #people
keret:keret #clan
fmar:fmar #genitals
bin:bin #woman

LEXICON NounSpecificity

<nspc><sg>:>o
<nspc><pl>:>no

LEXICON Possessor
det<det><pos><px1sg>:aye> # Dir/LR
det<det><pos><px1sg>:ye>
det<det><pos><px2sg>:be>
det<det><pos><px3sg>:vye>
det<det><pos><px3sg>:bye> # Dir/LR
det<det><pos><px1duinc>:kuve>
det<det><pos><px1duex>:nuve>
det<det><pos><px2du>:muve>
det<det><pos><px3du>:suve>
det<det><pos><px1pc>:skove>
det<det><pos><px1plinc>:kove>
det<det><pos><px1plex>:nkove> # Dir/LR
det<det><pos><px1plex>:inkove>
det<det><pos><px2pl>:mkove>
det<det><pos><px3plan>:se>
det<det><pos><px3plinan>:nbe>

LEXICON Possessum
<sg>:dya
<sg>:di # Dir/LR
<du>:suya
<du>:sui # Dir/LR
<pc>:skoya
<pc>:skoi # Dir/LR
<plan>:sya
<plan>:si # Dir/LR
<plinan>:na

LEXICON Conjunction 

ma<cnjcoo>:ma #and
kukr<cnjsub>:kukr #with, because
# kukru<cnjsub>:kukru #with, because
infa<cnjsub>:infa #so that
fa<cnjsub>:fa #so that
ra<cnjsub>:ra #until
indya<cnjcoo>:indya #so
nja<cnjcoo>:nja #so
inja<cnjcoo>:inja #so
vo<cnjsub>:vo #while
voi<cnjcoo>:voi #but
imboi<cnjcoo>:imboi #but
boi<cnjcoo>:boi #but
indo<cnjsub>:indo #then
ido<cnjsub>:ido #when, THEM
bo<cnjcoo>:bo #and
insama<cnjsub>:insama #so that
bape<cnjcoo>:bape #but
isof<cnjsub>:isof #until
kurbei<cnjsub>:kurbei #however

LEXICON Prepositions
ro<pr>:ro # at
ra<pr>:ra # along, over
do<pr>:do # at
ve<pr>:ve # to
fa<pr>:fa # to
kukr<pr>:kukr # with
snar<pr>:snar # because of
ker<pr>:ker # from
bur<pr>:bur # from
yov<pr>:yov # to
be<pr>:be #to

LEXICON InalienableRoot[pair,nonpair]
we:we[-pair] #leg
vru:vru[-nonpair] #head
vra:vra[-pair] #arm
sne:sne[-nonpair] #belly area
fi:fi[-nonpair] #vagina
si:si[-nonpair] #penis
do:do[-nonpair] #inside
sva:sva[-nonpair] #mouth
na:na[-nonpair] #tooth
snoni:snoni[-nonpair] #nose
mka:mka[-pair] #eye
sasu:sasu[-nonpair] #neck
don:don[-nonpair] #inside
sno:sno[-nonpair] #name
swa:swa[-nonpair] #spouse


LEXICON InalienableCircumfix(2)[pair,nonpair]
